Utah statutes.
20A-11-904.   Contribution given in another's name prohibited.

A person may not:

(1)  make a contribution in the name of another;

(2)  knowingly permit another to make a contribution in the person's name; or

(3)  knowingly accept a contribution made by one person in the name of another.

